Utah statutes.
16-16-202.   Signing and filing of records pursuant to judicial order.

(1)  If a person required by this chapter to sign or deliver a record to the division for filing does not do so, the district court, upon petition of an aggrieved person, may order:

(a)  the person to sign the record and deliver it to the division for filing; or

(b)  delivery of the unsigned record to the division for filing.

(2)  An aggrieved person under Subsection (1), other than the limited cooperative association or foreign cooperative to which the record pertains, shall make the association or foreign cooperative a party to the action brought to obtain the order.

(3)  An unsigned record filed pursuant to this section is effective.



Enacted by Chapter 363, 2008 General Session

